Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.270

Vacancies, quorum, compensation, travel expenses of commodity board members and employees.

(1) In the event of a vacancy in an elected position on the board, the remaining board members shall select a qualified person to fill the vacant position for the remainder of the current term or as provided in the marketing order or agreement.

(2) In the event of a vacancy on the board in a position appointed by the director, the remaining board members shall recommend to the director a qualified person for appointment to the vacant position. The director shall appoint the person recommended by the board unless the person fails to meet the qualifications of board members under this chapter and the marketing order or agreement.

(3) A majority of the voting members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of all business and the carrying out of all duties of the board.

(4) Each member of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.230. Members and employees of the board may be reimbursed for actual travel expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter, as defined under the commodity board's marketing order or agreement. Otherwise, if not defined or referenced in the marketing order or agreement, reimbursement for travel expenses shall be at the rates allowed state employees in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 2002 c 313 s 28; 2001 2nd sp.s. c 6 s 1; 1984 c 287 s 16; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 19; 1961 c 256 s 27.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.